Florida, session 2026, SB1362.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 36 37 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âAdvanced Air 38 Mobility Competitiveness and Infrastructure Act.â 39 Section 2.âParagraph (ffff) is added to subsection (7) of 40 section 212.08, Florida Statutes, to read: 41 212.08âSales, rental, use, consumption, distribution, and 42 storage tax; specified exemptions.âThe sale at retail, the 43 rental, the use, the consumption, the distribution, and the 44 storage to be used or consumed in this state of the following 45 are hereby specifically exempt from the tax imposed by this 46 chapter. 47 (7)âMISCELLANEOUS EXEMPTIONS.âExemptions provided to any 48 entity by this chapter do not inure to any transaction that is 49 otherwise taxable under this chapter when payment is made by a 50 representative or employee of the entity by any means, 51 including, but not limited to, cash, check, or credit card, even 52 when that representative or employee is subsequently reimbursed 53 by the entity. In addition, exemptions provided to any entity by 54 this subsection do not inure to any transaction that is 55 otherwise taxable under this chapter unless the entity has 56 obtained a sales tax exemption certificate from the department 57 or the entity obtains or provides other documentation as 58 required by the department. Eligible purchases or leases made 59 with such a certificate must be in strict compliance with this 60 subsection and departmental rules, and any person who makes an 61 exempt purchase with a certificate that is not in strict 62 compliance with this subsection and the rules is liable for and 63 shall pay the tax. The department may adopt rules to administer 64 this subsection. 65 (ffff)âElectric vertical takeoff and landing aircraft and 66 related items.âThe sale of the following is exempt from the tax 67 imposed by this chapter: 68 1.âElectric vertical takeoff and landing aircraft, 69 batteries, and training devices placed into service for at least 70 36 months. 71 2.âElectricity used for electric vertical takeoff and 72 landing aircraft training operations. 73 Section 3.âParagraph (i) of subsection (1) of section 74 255.065, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 75 255.065âPublic-private partnerships.â 76 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 77 (i)ââQualifying projectâ means: 78 1.âA facility or project that serves a public purpose, 79 including, but not limited to, any ferry or mass transit 80 facility, vehicle parking facility, airport or seaport facility, 81 rail facility or project, fuel supply facility, oil or gas 82 pipeline, medical or nursing care facility, recreational 83 facility, sporting or cultural facility, or educational facility 84 or other building or facility that is used or will be used by a 85 public educational institution, or any other public facility or 86 infrastructure that is used or will be used by the public at 87 large or in support of an accepted public purpose or activity; 88 2.âAn improvement, including equipment, of a building that 89 will be principally used by a public entity or the public at 90 large or that supports a service delivery system in the public 91 sector; 92 3.âA water, wastewater, or surface water management 93 facility or other related infrastructure; or 94 4.âNotwithstanding any provision of this section, for 95 projects that involve a facility owned or operated by the 96 governing board of a county, district, or municipal hospital or 97 health care system, or projects that involve a facility owned or 98 operated by a municipal electric utility, only those projects 99 that the governing board designates as qualifying projects 100 pursuant to this section; or 101 5.âVertiports and charging systems. 102 Section 4.âSection 330.412, Florida Statutes, is created to 103 read: 104 330.412âLimitation of liability for certain public or 105 private vertiport operators.â 106 (1)âFor purposes of this section, the term âvertiportâ has 107 the same meaning as in s. 332.151(1). 108 (2)âA vertiport operator is not liable for any personal 109 injury, wrongful death, property damage, or other economic loss 110 related to his or her acts or omissions in the performance of 111 his or her services unless the act or omission constituted gross 112 negligence or willful misconduct. 113 (3)âThe limitation of liability provided in subsection (2) 114 applies only if the vertiport operator posts and maintains a 115 clearly legible warning sign in a conspicuous location at the 116 vertiport which notifies the public of the liability protections 117 afforded under this section. 118 (4)âThe Department of Transportation shall adopt rules to 119 implement this section. 120 Section 5.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 121 332.007, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (e) is 122 added to subsection (6) of that section, to read: 123 332.007âAdministration and financing of aviation and 124 airport programs and projects; state plan.â 125 (2) 126 (c)âEach commercial service airport as defined in s. 127 332.0075 shall establish and maintain a comprehensive airport 128 infrastructure program to ensure the ongoing preservation of 129 airport infrastructure and facilities in safe and serviceable 130 condition. For purposes of this paragraph, the term âairport 131 infrastructureâ means the facilities, systems, and structural 132 components of an airport necessary for the safe and efficient 133 movement of people and goods. The term includes vertiport pads, 134 safety zones, charging systems, grid upgrades, and resilience 135 energy systems. Beginning November 1, 2025, and annually 136 thereafter, each commercial service airport shall provide a 137 certification to the department, in a manner prescribed by the 138 department, that it has established and maintains a 139 comprehensive airport infrastructure program. The comprehensive 140 airport infrastructure program report, and related documents and 141 records, must be open to inspection by the department and 142 maintained by the airport for at least 5 years. The 143 comprehensive airport infrastructure program must, at a minimum, 144 include all of the following: 145 1.âIdentification of airport infrastructure subject to 146 inspection and the schedule for the completion of such 147 inspections, taking into consideration the age, type, intended 148 use, and criticality of the infrastructure to undisrupted 149 commercial or cargo operations. 150 2.âA preventative maintenance program for routine 151 maintenance of airport infrastructure, for both commercial and 152 cargo operations. 153 3.âA plan to complete any necessary repairs to, or 154 rehabilitation or reconstruction of, airport infrastructure, 155 including prioritization and anticipated timeframe for 156 completion of the work. 157 4.âA progress report of inspections and their outcomes, 158 preventative maintenance, and previously identified repair to, 159 or rehabilitation or reconstruction of, airport infrastructure. 160 The progress report must include any changes in timeline for 161 completion, changes in cost estimates, and reasons any 162 inspection, preventative maintenance, or repair or 163 rehabilitation did not take place. 164 (6)âSubject to the availability of appropriated funds, the 165 department may participate in the capital cost of eligible 166 public-use airport and aviation development projects in 167 accordance with the following rates, unless otherwise provided 168 in the General Appropriations Act or the substantive bill 169 implementing the General Appropriations Act: 170 (e)âWhen federal funds are not available, the department 171 may fund up to 100 percent of the project costs of a public or 172 private vertiport. If federal funds are available, the 173 department may fund up to 80 percent of the nonfederal share of 174 such project costs. 175 Section 6.âSubsection (5) is added to section 332.15, 176 Florida Statutes, to read: 177 332.15âAdvanced air mobility.âThe Department of 178 Transportation shall: 179 (5)âCreate a model vertiport siting code, establish 180 vertiport demonstration corridors, and adopt rules for 181 coordination among the department, the Federal Aviation 182 Administration, and local governmental entities with respect to 183 vertiports. 184 Section 7.âSection 332.151, Florida Statutes, is created to 185 read: 186 332.151âVertiport siting; preemption.â 187 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âvertiportâ means an 188 area of land, a body of water, or a structure used or intended 189 to be used for the landing, takeoff, and surface maneuvering of 190 vertical takeoff and landing aircraft, including electric, 191 hybrid, and hydrogen-powered aircraft. The term includes 192 associated buildings, facilities, and infrastructure necessary 193 for the safe and efficient operation of such aircraft, 194 including, but not limited to, electric charging and fueling 195 systems, battery thermal management infrastructure, safety 196 areas, and passenger terminals. 197 (2)âThe Department of Transportation shall expeditiously 198 approve vertiports adopting the model vertiport siting code 199 created pursuant to s. 332.15(5). 200 (3)âThe regulation of vertiport design, aeronautical 201 operations, and aviation safety is preempted to the state to 202 ensure consistency with federal regulations. This subsection 203 does not apply to local land use and zoning authority or to 204 reasonable noise compatibility ordinances, provided such local 205 regulations do not effectively prohibit the operation of 206 advanced air mobility aircraft authorized by the Federal 207 Aviation Administration. 208 (4)(a)âThe regulation of electric aircraft charging 209 stations and associated infrastructure is preempted to the 210 state. 211 (b)âA local governmental entity may not enact or enforce an 212 ordinance or regulation related to the design, construction, or 213 installation of electric aircraft charging stations. 214 (c)âLocal governmental entities shall issue any required 215 building permits for electric aircraft charging stations based 216 solely upon compliance with the standards established by the 217 Department of Transportation under s. 332.15(5). 218 (d)âIf a local governmental entity does not approve or deny 219 a permit application for an electric aircraft charging station 220 within 15 business days after receipt of a complete application, 221 the application shall be deemed approved. 222 Section 8.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.